Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.100

Rejection of claim—Time limits—Notice—Time limit for suit—Compromise of claim.

(1) If the notice agent rejects a claim, in whole or in part, the claimant must bring suit against the notice agent within thirty days after notification of rejection or the claim is forever barred. The notice agent shall notify the claimant of the rejection and file an affidavit with the court showing the notification and the date of the notification. The notice agent shall notify the claimant of the rejection by personal service or certified mail addressed to the claimant or claimant's agent, if applicable, at the address stated in the claim. The date of service or of the postmark is the date of notification. The notification must advise the claimant that the claimant must bring suit in the proper court against the notice agent within thirty days after notification of rejection or the claim will be forever barred.

(2) If a claimant brings suit against the notice agent on a rejected claim and the notice agent has not received substantially all assets of the decedent that are liable for claims, the notice agent may only make an appearance in the action and may not answer the action but must cause a petition to be filed for the appointment of a personal representative within thirty days after service of the creditor's action on the notice agent. Under these circumstances, a judgment may not be entered in an action brought by a creditor against the notice agent earlier than twenty days after the personal representative has been substituted in that action for the notice agent.

(3) The notice agent may, before or after rejection of any claim, compromise the claim, whether due or not, absolute or contingent, liquidated, or unliquidated.

[ 1997 c 252 s 34; 1994 c 221 s 40.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.